lang_data/mni-fonipa/mni-fonipa.lexd
LEXICON misc
<misc>:oynə
<misc>:yam
<misc>:waŋnə
<misc>:təwbidrə́gəsú
<misc>:tə́rahumdə
<misc>:oybəsú
<misc>:ŋə́sidəgi
<misc>:mə́ŋaromgi
<misc>:mə́maŋdə
<misc>:phə́mkhibə
<misc>:mə́dúgi
<misc>:mə́thə́k
<misc>:tə́ramúkki
<misc>:kəya
<misc>:ə́mə
<misc>:píbə
<misc>:mə́dúy
<misc>:mə́nuŋdə
<misc>:ə́ykhóynə
<misc>:lə́wǰəbə
<misc>:wárépsiŋgi
<misc>:héktə́
<misc>:yáwrəmmənebə
<misc>:mə́dú
<misc>:lə́wbədúnəni
<misc>:ə́ykhóygi
<misc>:ŋəsáygi
<misc>:ə́tóp-ə́tóppə
<misc>:mənipurdəy
<misc>:kádrə́gəsú
<misc>:bhárə́tki
<misc>:ə́tóppə
<misc>:stettəgi
<misc>:kárəkpə
<misc>:partigi
<misc>:émpisiŋnə
<misc>:səbhádə
<misc>:raǰyə
<misc>:mənipuri
<misc>:səŋbidhangi
<misc>:seduldə
<misc>:čəlhəngədəbəni
<misc>:háybəgi
<misc>:mə́hákkini
<misc>:mə́sá-mə́sánə
<misc>:pukhətčəbə
<misc>:yabə
<misc>:háybə
<misc>:mə́sígi
<misc>:ə́síbu
<misc>:pukhətlədə́nə
<misc>:phaynəl
<misc>:rulgi
<misc>:kəynonəčiŋbə
<misc>:nəynəkhribə-tánəkhribə
<misc>:mə́yam
<misc>:ithildu
<misc>:ləybədúnəni
<misc>:íhan-hanbə
<misc>:səbhági
<misc>:mə́təmdəgi
<misc>:həwnə
<misc>:ə́ykhóysiŋnə
<misc>:hə́wrəkkhibə
<misc>:kerəladəgi
<misc>:ə́mənə
<misc>:čə́tthərəkpə
<misc>:míphəm
<misc>:kəyadə
<misc>:ítə́t-tə́ttə́nə
<misc>:lawdúnə
<misc>:lakkhibə
<misc>:lóynənə
<misc>:beŋgoldəgi
<misc>:kárəkkhibə
<misc>:ŋə́si
<misc>:həwǰíksú
<misc>:émpi
<misc>:mistərenə
<misc>:lawribə
<misc>:kárəmmedə́nə
<misc>:mású
<misc>:oyrəmme
<misc>:mánədi
<misc>:háydrədə́nə
<misc>:lólgi
<misc>:mə́taŋdə
<misc>:háyrəribəsi
<misc>:kərigino
<misc>:sí
<misc>:khə́nbigədəbəni
<misc>:mə́yamsú
<misc>:bičar
<misc>:təwbirobə
<misc>:mə́sí
<misc>:lawribəsi
<misc>:mə́hákki
<misc>:partidugi
<misc>:ə́sígi
<misc>:obs
<misc>:ə́dúgə
<misc>:pótni
<misc>:ə́dúnə
<misc>:səŋbidhandə
<misc>:tarə́gədi
<misc>:nesnəl
<misc>:partinena
<misc>:ləynəribəsiŋsigi
<misc>:təwnə́bə
<misc>:mə́háki
<misc>:levelgi
<misc>:oybə
<misc>:čə́pčábə
<misc>:wárép
<misc>:kəynomə
<misc>:lə́wbə
<misc>:lə́wdənə
<misc>:háybənədi
<misc>:yaroy
<misc>:oysú-oyroydəwbə
<misc>:háyǰəribsini
<misc>:ə́ykhoynə
<misc>:háyǰəbəsi
<misc>:ə́dumni
<misc>:čiŋdə
<misc>:šátpí
<misc>:kəlləkka
<misc>:kə́lləkk
<misc>:a
<misc>:íde
<misc>:ə́ynə
<misc>:kenge
<misc>:kendedo
<misc>:humbəgi
<misc>:kenbəni
<misc>:i
<misc>:de
<misc>:máləŋba
<misc>:ə́ysu
<misc>:kəydəwde
<misc>:ləyraŋnə
<misc>:lóybəgi
<misc>:kəlləkk
<misc>:noŋpók
<misc>:čiŋkhə́y
<misc>:hulle
<misc>:lakle
<misc>:púkniŋ
<misc>:húna
<misc>:šánəw
<misc>:ə́yúkkə
<misc>:páŋkhə́k
<misc>:oyribə
<misc>:nə́mannəba
<misc>:nə́mannəbí
<misc>:kəyadi
<misc>:kábəna
<misc>:kákhəre
<misc>:həwro
<misc>:yahəwro
<misc>:tháyna
<misc>:mə́maŋŋəydə
<misc>:mígə
<misc>:laygə
<misc>:səmnəriŋəydə
<misc>:kal
<misc>:ə́dúdə
<misc>:hənúbə
<misc>:hənúbí
<misc>:ə́ní
<misc>:ə́sí
<misc>:mə́púróybəgi
<misc>:yathəŋ
<misc>:mə́túŋ
<misc>:innə
<misc>:mági
<misc>:núpí
<misc>:tálóy
<misc>:čə́tli
<misc>:wádo
<misc>:mə́púróybədunə
<misc>:yamnə
<misc>:niŋthinə
<misc>:illí
<misc>:ə́sum
<misc>:háynə
<misc>:čannə-čínnənə
<misc>:tháynə
<misc>:mə́maŋŋəygi
<misc>:mə́təmgi
<misc>:nípí-nípánido
<misc>:noŋmədi
<misc>:kəmdəwri
<misc>:hənúbíduna
<misc>:máy
<misc>:núpádudə
<misc>:háyrəkʔe
<misc>:íbúŋŋo
<misc>:yúmbanlón
<misc>:ə́sídə
<misc>:ónthóknə
<misc>:wáredə́
<misc>:kə́ytheldəgi
<misc>:póttə́
<misc>:lə́ydúnə
<misc>:sum
<misc>:čábəsi
<misc>:nuŋŋaytəre
<misc>:ə́ŋəmbə
<misc>:kóybəgi
<misc>:thə́bə́k
<misc>:khə́rədi
<misc>:təwbə
<misc>:čummína
<misc>:čummídá
<misc>:íbémmá
<misc>:mə́ču-taydə́
<misc>:ə́sé
<misc>:ə́dúnidə́nə
<misc>:yúmbanbáydudi
<misc>:ə́də́
<misc>:iŋkholnedə́nə
<misc>:təwribsinə
<misc>:ə́təy
<misc>:yénšaŋ
<misc>:thabədi
<misc>:íphə́t-phə́tʔedo
<misc>:mə́sídə
<misc>:phəgədəbəsidi
<misc>:pángə
<misc>:tharəbədi
<misc>:phənihé
<misc>:éʔ
<misc>:ə́dúy
<misc>:wá
<misc>:oyrə́boyrədi
<misc>:nəhál
<misc>:ə́dó
<misc>:pán
<misc>:čáge
<misc>:háydə́nə
<misc>:pándu
<misc>:laytə́ŋ
<misc>:lə́yrəkpəni
<misc>:ónthoknə
<misc>:phəkhərənidə́
<misc>:óʔ
<misc>:pu-puthorəkʔu
<misc>:tharəge
<misc>:ə́sínə
<misc>:mukhí
<misc>:phəzəkhərə́bə
<misc>:nóy-nóy
<misc>:lə́wbədu
<misc>:puthorəkʔí
<misc>:hənúbəsinə
<misc>:laytə́ŋdumə
<misc>:purə́gə
<misc>:phəǰənə
<misc>:káŋkhún
<misc>:phəzənə
<misc>:hə́ndúnə
<misc>:thage
<misc>:káŋkhúl
<misc>:mə́nawsi
<misc>:ə́kóybə
<misc>:čə́p-mannə
<misc>:siŋbə
<misc>:phə́n
<misc>:ípú
<misc>:hənúbədú
<misc>:kidə́nə
<misc>:yeŋŋí
<misc>:háy
<misc>:kəyno
<misc>:nə́ŋnə
<misc>:ə́yŋóndə
<misc>:háybədi
<misc>:ipúnə
<misc>:tharibədu
<misc>:lallene
<misc>:kə́rəm-háynə
<misc>:lallibə
<misc>:čawrəroy
<misc>:mə́dúdi
<misc>:kuynə
<misc>:ə́ydi
<misc>:ípúnə
<misc>:khə́ŋdrə́bənəni
<misc>:ípúdəgi
<misc>:pháwbə
<misc>:kóybədə
<misc>:həybə
<misc>:ǰatni
<misc>:yoŋnəbu
<misc>:mídəy
<misc>:hennə
<misc>:hə́wnəbrəne
<misc>:mí
<misc>:hənúbədi
<misc>:malli
<misc>:hənúbəgi
<misc>:mə́təwdi
<misc>:mə́təw
<misc>:tházədrə
<misc>:yeŋbiyu
<misc>:həyeŋdu
<misc>:thumgədəbəni
<misc>:thabəna
<misc>:həyeŋse
<misc>:lép
<misc>:yəwgədəbni
<misc>:waŋbədə
<misc>:ya
<misc>:nə́činthídə́
<misc>:yoŋsimə
<misc>:háybinu
<misc>:se
<misc>:phəzənəne
<misc>:khétle
<misc>:háyrə́gə
<misc>:ə́mədə
<misc>:yómbiro
<misc>:ə́ní-ə́ní
<misc>:ə́hum-ə́hum
<misc>:thabirəmmo
<misc>:həyeŋ
<misc>:noŋŋalləkpədədi
<misc>:khwáŋmúk
<misc>:waŋgədəbənine
<misc>:phənəbu
<misc>:natəy-čáyhé
<misc>:təwrə́bə
<misc>:ə́hən
<misc>:phəre
<misc>:ə́dúdi
<misc>:yeŋnəni
<misc>:sóybə
<misc>:tarəbədi
<misc>:taydo
<misc>:phúbiyu
<misc>:ipú
<misc>:mə́sídəgi
<misc>:čə́ŋŋədə́nə
<misc>:núpídə
<misc>:háyre
<misc>:thabədə
<misc>:həyrə́bə
<misc>:khulákpəmə
<misc>:theŋnəre
<misc>:mánə
<misc>:háybəbu
<misc>:thaw
<misc>:waŋni
<misc>:háyrine
<misc>:tháǰədedə́
<misc>:núpí lə́wsiŋni
<misc>:lə́wbiroydəbəra
<misc>:mə́wá
<misc>:lə́wde
<misc>:háyrisidə
<misc>:təw
<misc>:phúttə́nə
<misc>:mə́ku
<misc>:lá-látóndunə
<misc>:káŋkhúldudə
<misc>:thare
<misc>:kúpsəllə́gə
<misc>:nuŋdaŋ
<misc>:móynə
<misc>:khullákpədunə
<misc>:purəktə́nə
<misc>:ə́məgə
<misc>:loynə
<misc>:ə́dú
<misc>:mə́khum
<misc>:tə́ydre
<misc>:hawre
<misc>:mónmón
<misc>:čénkhidúnə
<misc>:túren
<misc>:khoŋbándə
<misc>:lə́mbán
<misc>:ə́čəwbədu
<misc>:purəkʔə́gə
<misc>:thazəlləmme
<misc>:noŋŋallə́gə
<misc>:thórəkpə
<misc>:kandədi
<misc>:pánsí
<misc>:ge-ge-ge-ge
<misc>:láwnə
<misc>:khwáŋ-khwáŋmúk
<misc>:nuŋšidə́
<misc>:háysidi
<misc>:núpígə
<misc>:mə́tə́y-mə́naw
<misc>:ə́níse
<misc>:hə́rəwnəre
<misc>:ə́sídi
<misc>:čawgə-čawre
<misc>:ŋə́simək
<misc>:čábə
<misc>:yay
<misc>:laydə
<misc>:mə́ka
<misc>:kə́tsi
<misc>:ə́ykhóy
<misc>:háyye
<misc>:phəy
<misc>:ə́dúgi
<misc>:mə́kadu
<misc>:laygi
<misc>:khə́rə
<misc>:thəmme
<misc>:mə́khóy
<misc>:írónnə́bə
<misc>:soydə́nə
<misc>:írónbəysidi
<misc>:mə́ytəy
<misc>:čə́tnəbídə
<misc>:hénták
<misc>:nəttrə́gə
<misc>:mə́maŋŋəydədi
<misc>:čə́tnərəmmí
<misc>:čə́tnərəmde
<misc>:ŋákhási
<misc>:kəŋhəllerə́gə
<misc>:kúpnə
<misc>:čə́phúdə
<misc>:ə́dúgumbə
<misc>:móygidi
<misc>:ləyrəmdədə́nə
<misc>:mə́naw
<misc>:núpígidə
<misc>:káŋdrúm
<misc>:mə́čá
<misc>:písə́k
<misc>:khítʔəŋ
<misc>:pírəkʔí
<misc>:núpísinə
<misc>:páynə
<misc>:lakpədə
<misc>:takhre
<misc>:ədə́gi
<misc>:khə́ŋdrə́bdudə
<misc>:mə́ʔóŋ
<misc>:manbə
<misc>:tháŋgəyséŋbə
<misc>:héntákti
<misc>:nə́ttəbə
<misc>:mə́sə́k-mə́təwdi
<misc>:mə́nəm
<misc>:mə́hádi
<misc>:kərigumbə
<misc>:pót
<misc>:ə́məkhə́k
<misc>:čə́máydə
<misc>:ə́dúga
<misc>:íróndudədi
<misc>:nəmdəre
<misc>:nuŋšidəbə
<misc>:nəmthíbə
<misc>:nəmme
<misc>:nəmthíkhredá
<misc>:sídi
<misc>:héntáknə
<misc>:phə́təbəne
<misc>:háybədudə
<misc>:ə́dúnədi
<misc>:lə́mbánninə
<misc>:yadrenehé
<misc>:ə́múksú
<misc>:lawwí
<misc>:ŋəsáy
<misc>:phəttəbə
<misc>:pótnə
<misc>:tádúnə
<misc>:tarə́gə
<misc>:ə́dúsú
<misc>:ə́múk
<misc>:nəmthíkhəre
<misc>:tukkəčəkhəre
<misc>:təwrisidi
<misc>:héntákpu
<misc>:purəkpə
<misc>:pə́ŋkhə́t-khə́tnəre
<misc>:ədə́y
<misc>:konthə́ŋdə
<misc>:túminləyro
<misc>:phúdrədi
<misc>:yarəroy
<misc>:móy
<misc>:šóydənə
<misc>:lakkəni
<misc>:nasinnəregəne
<misc>:nə́púse
<misc>:kə́ppune
<misc>:kəri
<misc>:háybu
<misc>:həlləkʔu
<misc>:ə́šé
<misc>:ə́čəwbə
<misc>:hápčəllu
<misc>:hápčillerə́gə
<misc>:sirə́bəni
<misc>:nóy
<misc>:čə́tlo
<misc>:háyyu
<misc>:páydə́nə
<misc>:ə́khúbədudə
<misc>:čoŋthokʔə́gə
<misc>:phúthədə́nə
<misc>:loysillə́gə
<misc>:loyre
<misc>:háyribə
<misc>:núpísigə
<misc>:mə́thə́ŋgi
<misc>:ə́dúdədi
<misc>:hənúbəsi
<misc>:narədə́nə
<misc>:mə́nuŋdudə
<misc>:čə́ŋdə́nə
<misc>:kúpsəlle
<misc>:háykhibə
<misc>:ə́dum
<misc>:šikhibə
<misc>:aaaummm
<misc>:kə́ppədudə
<misc>:mə́yamse
<misc>:lakʔe
<misc>:íbén
<misc>:kəydəwre
<misc>:nə́púsi
<misc>:sirenehé
<misc>:kənasú
<misc>:ləytrene
<misc>:phumbinə́bə
<misc>:lidə́-libə
<misc>:mə́təmdə
<misc>:míóybəse
<misc>:lə́ynúŋdə
<misc>:phumləmmí
<misc>:mə́təwgumdə́nə
<misc>:lə́ynuŋdə
<misc>:phumnənə́bəgi
<misc>:səŋskar-təwbə
<misc>:həwǰíkki mə́róndə
<misc>:seŋdoknə́bəgidəməktə
<misc>:puro
<misc>:čə́ŋdúnə
<misc>:yoŋyam
<misc>:konthóŋgi
<misc>:hótnəriŋəydudə
<misc>:čoŋthoktə́nə
<misc>:phúdə́nə
<misc>:mə́kók
<misc>:sibə
<misc>:mə́sídəydi
<misc>:nuŋŋaytədə́nə
<misc>:mə́yamsi
<misc>:čénkhəre
<misc>:numídaŋdə
<misc>:mə́pú-mə́bén
<misc>:ə́nínə
<misc>:mə́yamnə
<misc>:ŋə́sidi
<misc>:ípú-íbénsi
<misc>:tare
<misc>:čə́ŋŋəkʔí
<misc>:lə́wsiŋnə
<misc>:čə́ŋŋəkpədə
<misc>:hənúbənə
<misc>:híptúnə
<misc>:lakpədudə
<misc>:khəŋdúnə
<misc>:phə́yšúptu
<misc>:lakʔi
<misc>:yoŋgi
<misc>:mə́natondə
<misc>:mə́nəmdu
<misc>:mə́nəmdo
<misc>:mə́natondudə
<misc>:mə́púsi
<misc>:čénkhre
<misc>:mə́yambu
<misc>:máythíbə
<misc>:tháynəgi
<misc>:hənúbígi
<misc>:yoŋsi
<misc>:píkhí
<misc>:wárí
<misc>:ŋə́sigidi
<misc>:loysəlle
<misc>:ləyrəmboyre
<misc>:hənúbídugi
<misc>:kənam
<misc>:ləyǰəde
<misc>:hənúbíninə
<misc>:mə́wasú
<misc>:hənúbísi
<misc>:láyrə́y
<misc>:ə́hanbədə
<misc>:lə́yrə́y
<misc>:ə́də́gi
<misc>:kəptreŋnə
<misc>:təreŋnə
<misc>:nómǰə khótčədə́nə
<misc>:sum-sum
<misc>:mə́punsi
<misc>:čánəbədi
<misc>:yamǰəde
<misc>:mə́tómdəni
<misc>:nuŋti-nuŋtigi
<misc>:nómǰəbədúnə
<misc>:pəysáse
<misc>:khə́rə-khə́rə
<misc>:mə́təm
<misc>:ləyrə́gədi
<misc>:oyredo
<misc>:mínə
<misc>:kəlləknəre
<misc>:sénǰaw
<misc>:páybí
<misc>:lə́ybə
<misc>:ŋəmbí
<misc>:kaynə
<misc>:háynəre
<misc>:ə́dúdəgidi
<misc>:noŋmə
<misc>:húránbə
<misc>:ímuŋ
<misc>:kənaməttə
<misc>:ləytəbə
<misc>:hənúbísigi
<misc>:ímuŋdəbu
<misc>:ŋəm-oydəboy
<misc>:ləyte
<misc>:húránbəsi
<misc>:mə́thə́ŋ-mə́thə́ŋ
<misc>:čə́ŋsənkhidə́nə
<misc>:ə́mə́mbə
<misc>:pódónsigi
<misc>:mə́rumdə
<misc>:húránbəsinə
<misc>:hənúbísinə
<misc>:čə́ŋəkʔibə
<misc>:húránbədu
<misc>:mágə
<misc>:khə́tnəbə
<misc>:ŋəmde
<misc>:khə́ŋŋí
<misc>:mə́tómdə
<misc>:khə́lli
<misc>:mə́síbu
<misc>:təwdə́nə
<misc>:mási
<misc>:ŋəmgədəge
<misc>:tanǰásidə
<misc>:lə́wsiŋ
<misc>:mə́sídi
<misc>:kəptreŋdu
<misc>:ə́ygibu
<misc>:ímaŋdə
<misc>:thallibə
<misc>:pódónsidəni
<misc>:pódónsi
<misc>:mə́sé
<misc>:ə́ygə
<misc>:nuŋtigi
<misc>:ítómdə
<misc>:kandə
<misc>:nuŋŋaynə-nuŋŋaynə
<misc>:šabənida
<misc>:Ítá
<misc>:nə́ŋbu
<misc>:khótpə
<misc>:ə́mətə́
<misc>:ítá
<misc>:lawrəp
<misc>:ŋáŋŋí
<misc>:ə́dúdəgi
<misc>:kəwbədudə
<misc>:čə́ŋŋəkpə
<misc>:mə́pándə
<misc>:čə́ŋbə
<misc>:húránbəgi
<misc>:mə́khondu
<misc>:lawnə-lawnə
<misc>:kəwredo
<misc>:mə́mə́ydədi
<misc>:lə́wsiŋ ləybísinə
<misc>:lə́ykaydə
<misc>:khə́ŋnənə́bə
<misc>:magi
<misc>:mə́yúmdə
<misc>:čə́ŋŋe
<misc>:háybəsi
<misc>:khə́ŋŋe
<misc>:thawmə́ysidə
<misc>:hənǰən-hənǰən
<misc>:kəwdúnə
<misc>:lə́ykay
<misc>:khə́ŋhəlle
<misc>:lə́ykaynə
<misc>:khə́ŋŋedo
<misc>:nə́ŋgi
<misc>:ímuŋdə
<misc>:thókʔidu
<misc>:təwrəge
<misc>:čə́ŋŋə́bro
<misc>:lə́ykaygi
<misc>:mísiŋnə
<misc>:yúmsi
<misc>:íkóy-kóyšəlle
<misc>:hənúbídunə
<misc>:nuŋšibə
<misc>:kóysillibəsiŋsinə
<misc>:ímuŋsida
<misc>:thóktəbə
<misc>:wáthokghotʔə́nə
<misc>:thókʔe
<misc>:mə́óŋdə
<misc>:kóysəlle
<misc>:khə́ŋbə
<misc>:tanǰádudədi
<misc>:lə́ykay-lə́ykaysá
<misc>:lawre
<misc>:húránbədunə
<misc>:ímuŋdudəgi
<misc>:čénthokkhibə
<misc>:mə́təmdədi
<misc>:mísiŋ
<misc>:íkóy-íkóysindúnə
<misc>:húránbədo
<misc>:lə́wsiŋbí
<misc>:íráy-láynə
<misc>:pháre
<misc>:phákhiye
<misc>:kekrúhənǰəbə
<misc>:núpámə
<misc>:mə́hák
<misc>:mə́má
<misc>:lukhrabíni
<misc>:núpá
<misc>:súniŋŋay
<misc>:míšə́k
<misc>:ə́məni
<misc>:kekrúhənǰəbəsinə
<misc>:lukhrabí
<misc>:sum təwrəkpə
<misc>:pákhə́ŋ
<misc>:phárəkʔe
<misc>:phárəkpə
<misc>:mə́təmsidə
<misc>:sétniŋŋay
<misc>:mə́púŋphánə
